Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 203.720 is amended to read:
203.720. (1) The electors of [ any] the county, by majority vote of such electors voting [ thereon]
on the question  at any legally called election, may  adopt, amend, revise or repeal a county charter.
(2) The charter, or legislation passed by  the county pursuant [ thereto] to the charter , shall
provide a method whereby the electors of the county, by majority vote of such electors voting
[thereon] on the question  at any legally called election, may amend, revise or repeal the charter.
(3) The county charter and legislative provisions relating to the amendment,  revision or repeal
of the  charter are deemed to be matters of county concern and shall prevail over any conflicting
provisions of ORS 203.710 to 203.770 and other state statutes unless otherwise specifically provided
by conflicting state statutes first effective after January 1, 1961.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding the charter  of the county or any other provision of law, the
adoption, amendment, revision or repeal of a county charter shall be  decided by simple ma-
jority vote.
(b) Nothing in this subsection is intended  to prevent a county from amending its charter
to provide for the adoption by a  supermajority or double majority vote or by any other
heightened vote requirement of measures imposing or increasing fees, taxes,  assessments,
fines, penalties, charges or any other revenue-generating mechanisms of any kind.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 221.210 is amended to read:
221.210. (1) The city council  may refer and the people may initiate municipal measures or
amendments to the charter of [ a] the city as provided in ORS  250.265 to 250.346, unless ORS 250.255
makes ORS 250.265 to 250.346 inapplicable to the city.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the charter of the city or  any other provision of law, the adoption,
amendment, revision, repeal or surrender of a city charter  shall be decided by simple ma-
jority vote.
(b) Nothing in this subsection is intended to prevent a city  from amending its charter to
provide for the adoption by a supermajority or double majority vote  or by any other height-
ened vote requirement of measures imposing or increasing fees,  taxes, assessments, fines,
penalties, charges or any other revenue-generating mechanisms of any kind.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3687 (HB 3687-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3687 (HB 3687-A) Page 2